Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201816-672.02
Ordinance; hearing; notice.

Notice of the time when any ordinance as provided in section 16-672.01 shall be set for consideration before the mayor and city council shall be given by at least two publications in a legal newspaper in or of general circulation in such city, which publication shall state the entire wording of the ordinance. The last publication shall be not less than five days nor more than two weeks prior to the time set for the hearing of objections to the passage of any such ordinance, at which hearing the owners of real property located in such improvement district and which might become subject to assessment for the cost of the contemplated improvement may appear and make objections to the improvement. Thereafter the ordinance may be amended and passed or passed as proposed.

Laws 1961, c. 46, § 2, p. 178;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 126.